es: Hecho en Bolivia
en: Made in Bolivia
fr: Fabriqué en Bolivie
pt: Feito na Bolívia

es: Hecho en Brazil
en: Made in Brazil
fr: Fabriqué au Brésil
pt: Feito no Brasil

en: Made in Bulgaria
bg: Произведено в България
de: Hergestellt in Bulgarien
es: Hecho en Bulgaria
fr: Fabriqué en Bulgarie
it: Prodotto in Bulgaria
nl: Gemaakt in Bulgarije

en: Made in China
ar: صنع في الصين
de: Hergestellt in China
es: Hecho en China
fr: Fabriqué en Chine
it: Fatto in Cina
ja: 中国製
ko: 중국산
nl: Gemaakt in China
pl: Wyprodukowano w Chinach
pt: Feito na China
ru: Сделано в Китае
zh: 中国制造

en: Made in Greece
bg: Произведено в Гърция
fr: Fabriqué en Grèce

es: Hecho en India
en: Made in India
fr: Fabriqué en Inde
pt: Feito na Índia

es: Hecho en Indonesia
en: Made in Indonesia
fr: Fabriqué en Indonésie
pt: Feito na Indonésia

en: Made in Japan
de: Hergestellt in Japan
es: Hecho en Japón
fr: Fabriqué au Japon
it: Fatto in Giappone
ja: 日本製

en: Made in Romania
bg: Произведено в Румъния
fr: Fabriqué en Roumanie

en: Made in Serbia
bg: Произведено в Сърбия
fr: Fabriqué en Serbie

en: Made in Taiwan
de: Hergestellt in Taiwan
es: Hecho en Taiwán
fr: Fabriqué à Taïwan
it: Fatto a Taiwan
pt: Feito em Taiwan
ru: Сделано на Тайване
zh: 台灣製造

es: Hecho en Thailandia
en: Made in Thailand
fr: Fabriqué en Thaïlande
pt: Feito na Tailândia

en: Made in USA
de: Hergestellt in den USA
es: Hecho en EE. UU.
fr: Fabriqué aux États-Unis
it: Fatto negli Stati Uniti
pt: Feito nos EUA

en: Made in Vietnam
de: Hergestellt in Vietnam
es: Hecho en Vietnam
fr: Fabriqué au Viêt Nam
it: Fatto in Vietnam
vi: Sản xuất tại Việt Nam

hr: dokazana kvaliteta
xx: dokazana kvaliteta

hr: hrana hrvatskih farmi
xx: hrana hrvatskih farmi

hr: mlijeko hrvatskih farmi
xx: mlijeko hrvatskih farmi

hr: med hrvatskih pčelinjaka
xx: med hrvatskih pčelinjaka

hr: jaja hrvatskih farmi
xx: jaja hrvatskih farmi

hr: kruh hrvatskih polja
xx: kruh hrvatskih polja